Washington, session 2025-2026, SB6108.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. The legislature finds the following:(1) The bluntnose sixgill shark is a unique and iconic marine species closely associated with Washington's coastal and Puget Sound waters. Also known as the cow shark, the bluntnose sixgill shark is one of the only shark species in the world with six gill slits, rather than the more common five. It is among the largest shark species, capable of reaching lengths of more than 15 feet, and is considered a living relic, having existed largely unchanged for many years;(2) Sixgill sharks are typically deep-water animals but are unusually accessible in Washington's inland marine waters, where they can be observed by residents, researchers, and divers at relatively shallow depths. This makes Washington one of the few places in the world where people can regularly observe sixgill sharks in their natural habitat. The city of Des Moines is widely recognized as the "sixgill capital of the world" due to its consistent sightings and research activity; and(3) Designating the sixgill shark as the official state shark will promote public awareness of Washington's marine ecosystems, encourage science-based education, and support efforts to preserve and protect this important species for future generations.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 1.20 RCW to read as follows:The Hexanchus griseus, more commonly known as the bluntnose sixgill shark, is hereby designated as the official shark of the state of Washington.--- END ---